Massachusetts, session 194th, H2434.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 2AAAAAA the following section:- 
Section 2BBBBBB. (a) There is hereby established and set up on the books of the 
Commonwealth a Pediatric Cancer Research and Resource Project Trust Fund for the purpose of 
providing grants for pediatric cancer research projects and pediatric cancer resource projects for 
use in the Commonwealth. 
(b) The fund shall be credited with: (i) appropriations or other money authorized or 
transferred by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) funds 
from public and private sources, including but not limited to gifts, grants, and donations and (iii) 
any interest earned on such money. 

of 3 11  (c) Subject to appropriation, amounts credited to the fund shall be used for grants for 
pediatric cancer research and pediatric cancer resource projects in the Commonwealth. Money 
remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund. 
(d) As uses in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings unless 
the context clearly requires otherwise: 
“Pediatric cancer research project”, a scientific research project focusing on the causes, 
prevention, education, screening, or cure of pediatric cancer, or the symptoms or effects 
experienced by patients following completion of a course of treatment for pediatric cancer, and 
may include basic, clinical and epidemiologic research. No more than 5 percent of awarded 
funding may be used for operational costs incurred by awardees. 
“Pediatric cancer resource project”, an educational, informational, awareness or 
fundraising project that benefits the commonwealth and improves the lives of individuals 
afflicted by pediatric cancer through an enhanced understanding of the diagnosis, financial 
impact and long-term health impacts of pediatric cancer and provides support to reduce its 
psychosocial and educational burden. No more than 5 percent of awarded funding may be used 
for operational costs incurred by awardees. 
SECTION 2. The executive office of Health and Human Services shall establish a 
permanent advisory committee to award and allocate grants for pediatric cancer research and 
pediatric cancer resource projects in the Commonwealth. The advisory committee’s membership 
shall consist of 7 members appointed by the secretary of health and human services 2 of whom 
shall be survivors of pediatric cancer or caregivers to individuals with pediatric cancer, 1 of 

of 3 32 whom shall be a representative of a nationwide pediatric cancer advocacy non-profit and 4 of 
whom shall be professionals from the pediatric cancer field. 
Not later than August 1, the executive office of Health and Human Services shall submit 
an annual report to the House and Senate Committees on Ways and Means, Joint Committee on 
Public Health, And Joint Committee on Healthcare Finance detailing the number, amounts, and 
recipients of the grants awarded pursuant to section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29 of the General 
Laws, the resulting research, return on investment, and other relevant information as requested 
by the special committee.